Utah statutes.
70A-9a-405.   Modification of assigned contract.
(1)  A modification of or substitution for an assigned contract is effective
against an assignee if made in good faith.  The assignee acquires
corresponding rights under the modified or substituted contract.  The
assignment may provide that the modification or substitution is a breach of
contract by the assignor.  This Subsection (1) is subject to Subsections (2)
through (4).
(2) Subsection (1) applies to the extent that:
(a)  the right to payment or a part thereof under an assigned contract has not
been fully earned by performance; or
(b)  the right to payment or a part thereof has been fully earned by
performance and the account debtor has not received notification of the
assignment under Subsection 70A-9a-406(1).
(3)  This section is subject to law other than this chapter which establishes
a different rule for an account debtor who is an individual and who incurred
the obligation primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.
(4)  This section does not apply to an assignment of a health-care-insurance
receivable.
